Hawaii statutes.
§11-75 Duties of precinct officials.
The duties of the precinct officials shall vary with the voting system in use
in the precinct. The duties for the particular system shall be assigned by the
chief election officer by regulations adopted for such purpose. [L 1970, c 26,
pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(x)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next